Florida, session 2026, SB164.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 768.18, Florida Statutes, is reordered 19 and amended to read: 20 768.18âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 768.16-768.26: 21 (5)(1)ââSurvivorsâ means the decedentâs spouse, children, 22 parents, and, when partly or wholly dependent on the decedent 23 for support or services, any blood relatives and adoptive 24 brothers and sisters. It includes the child born out of wedlock 25 of a mother, but not the child born out of wedlock of the father 26 unless the father has recognized a responsibility for the 27 childâs support. It also includes the parents of an unborn 28 child. 29 (1)(2)ââMinor childrenâ means children under 25 years of 30 age, notwithstanding the age of majority. 31 (4)(3)ââSupportâ includes contributions in kind as well as 32 money. 33 (3)(4)ââServicesâ means tasks, usually of a household 34 nature, regularly performed by the decedent that will be a 35 necessary expense to the survivors of the decedent. These 36 services may vary according to the identity of the decedent and 37 survivor and shall be determined under the particular facts of 38 each case. 39 (2)(5)ââNet accumulationsâ means the part of the decedentâs 40 expected net business or salary income, including pension 41 benefits, that the decedent probably would have retained as 42 savings and left as part of her or his estate if the decedent 43 had lived her or his normal life expectancy. âNet business or 44 salary incomeâ is the part of the decedentâs probable gross 45 income after taxes, excluding income from investments continuing 46 beyond death, that remains after deducting the decedentâs 47 personal expenses and support of survivors, excluding 48 contributions in kind. 49 (6)ââUnborn childâ means a member of the species Homo 50 sapiens, at any stage of development, who is carried in the 51 womb. 52 Section 2.âSection 768.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to 53 read: 54 768.19âRight of action.â 55 (1)âWhen the death of a person is caused by the wrongful 56 act, negligence, default, or breach of contract or warranty of 57 any person, including those occurring on navigable waters, and 58 the event would have entitled the person injured to maintain an 59 action and recover damages if death had not ensued, the person 60 or watercraft that would have been liable in damages if death 61 had not ensued shall be liable for damages as specified in this 62 act notwithstanding the death of the person injured, although 63 death was caused under circumstances constituting a felony. 64 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this act, a 65 wrongful death action for the death of an unborn child may not 66 be brought against the mother of the unborn child or against a 67 medical provider for lawful medical care provided in compliance 68 with the applicable standard of care, including, but not limited 69 to, care related to assisted reproductive technologies as 70 defined in s. 742.13, provided with the consent of the mother. 71 Section 3.âSubsection (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection 72 (6) of section 768.21, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 73 768.21âDamages.âAll potential beneficiaries of a recovery 74 for wrongful death, including the decedentâs estate, shall be 75 identified in the complaint, and their relationships to the 76 decedent shall be alleged. Damages may be awarded as follows: 77 (4)âEach parent of a deceased minor child or an unborn 78 child may also recover for mental pain and suffering from the 79 date of injury. Each parent of an adult child may also recover 80 for mental pain and suffering if there are no other survivors. 81 (6)âThe decedentâs personal representative may recover for 82 the decedentâs estate the following: 83 (a)âLoss of earnings of the deceased from the date of 84 injury to the date of death, less lost support of survivors 85 excluding contributions in kind, with interest. Loss of the 86 prospective net accumulations of an estate, which might 87 reasonably have been expected but for the wrongful death, 88 reduced to present money value, may also be recovered: 89 1.âIf the decedentâs survivors include a surviving spouse 90 or lineal descendants; or 91 2.âIf the decedent is not a minor child or an unborn child 92 as those terms are defined in s. 768.18 s. 768.18(2), there are 93 no lost support and services recoverable under subsection (1), 94 and there is a surviving parent. 95 96 Evidence of remarriage of the decedentâs spouse is admissible. 97 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.